District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.06h

Continued testing and remediation.

(a)

Upon receipt of the report from the Panel set forth in § 34-2202.06e, the General Manager shall create and implement a plan that considers potential remediation options and continued testing for unregulated contaminants and endocrine disruptor compounds in a manner consistent with the recommendations of the Panel’s report.

(b)

If formal remediation steps cannot be taken for a specific contaminant, the General Manager shall provide evidence of infeasibility of remediation for that contaminant.

(c)

The General Manager shall submit the plan to the Mayor and the Council.

(d)

The Authority shall be required to implement the provisions of this section upon a transfer by the Chief Financial Officer of the District from the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia to the Authority of the funding necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

(e)

Repealed.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206h
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-240, § 2(b), 59 DCR 14790
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7012(b), 62 DCR 10905

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-240 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 repealed (e).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010c, see § 2(j) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7010c(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010c, and amendment of this section, see § 2(k) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7010c(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010c, and amendment of this section, see § 2(k) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7016(k)(2) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation